src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON DIEHTET_TV  !!= @CODE@ Only this one word, unusual diphtong behavior. No passive
                    +TV:           DeverbalVerbsDIEHTET ;
            +TV+Ind+Prs:           I-diehtet-V          ;
            +TV+Ind+Prt:%>         II-sg72pl9           ;
            +TV+Ind+Prt:e%>Q1      II-other             ;
                +TV+Pot:i%>Q1tj    I-odd-V              ;
          +TV+Imprt+Sg2:e%>Q1      ENDLEX               ; ! Basic Imperative, like ConNeg
          +TV+Imprt+Du2:te%>       ENDLEX               ;
              +TV+Imprt:%>         IMP7-EVEN            ;
          +TV+Imprt+Du1:%>on       ENDLEX               ;
          +TV+Imprt+Pl1:%>op       ENDLEX               ;
            +TV+ImprtII:%>u        IMP8-EVEN            ;
               +IV+Cond:á%>»Q1lulu  V-ODD-PRET          ;
! Infinite
                +TV+Inf:e%>t       K                    ;
             +TV+PrfPrc:á%>m       K                    ;
    +TV+PrsPrc+Err/Orth:Y6         PRSPRC               ; ! Noun, not correct, III grade!
                +TV+Ger:e%>Q1dijn  K                    ;
                +TV+Sup:á%>Q1tjit  K                    ;
             +TV+VAbess:e%>Q1k     K                    ;
!             +TV+VAbess:e%>Q1dak   K                    ;
             +TV+VAbess:e%>Q1k     VUOHTA               ;
!             +TV+VAbess:e%>Q1dak   VUOHTA               ;
               +TV+VGen:e%>Q1      K                    ;
! ConNeg
         +TV+Ind+ConNeg:e%>Q1      K                    ;
         +TV+Pot+ConNeg:i%>Q1tja   K                    ;
       +TV+Imprt+ConNeg:e%>Q1      ENDLEX               ;
 +TV+ImprtII+ConNeg+Pl2:%>u        ENDLEX               ;
 +TV+ImprtII+ConNeg+Sg2:%>u        ENDLEX               ;
 +TV+ImprtII+ConNeg+Du2:%>u        ENDLEX               ;
          +TV+Actio+Nom:em         K                    ;
          +TV+Actio+Gen:ema        K                    ;
          +TV+Actio+Com:emijn      K                    ;
          +TV+Actio+Ess:emin       K                    ;
          +TV+Actio+Ela:emis       K                    ;
  +TV+Der3+Der/InchL+V:e»goahte%> INFL-EVEN            ;
                    +TV:e          DeverbalNounsDIEHTET ;

!!€gt-norm: diehtet # Even-syllable test
!!€ diedáv:           diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ diehtiv:          diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ diedijma:         diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON GÁDJOT_TV !!= @CODE@ o-verbs. only duvvat passive.
                                   +TV:%>                        GÁDJOTStem          ;
                                   +TV:                          DeverbalVerbsBASSAT ;
                              +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu                 V-ODD-PRET          ;
!+TV: EVEN-PASSIVE ; replaced by individual pointers to avoid short pass.
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V:»Y9u OADDÁTINCH ; NO SHORT PASS HERE! !replaced by individual pointers to avoid pass + actio, reintroduced since it is usual!
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/InchL+V:»Y9ugoahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V:»Y9u INFL-CONTRACTED ;
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der2+Der/NomAg:»Y9ujiddje@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORder ;
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/mus+N:»Y9umuss flagMUS ;
 +TV+Der1+Der/PassL+V+Der3+Der/InchL+V+IV:»Q1duvva»goahte%>         INFL-EVEN           ;
                   +TV+Der1+Der/PassL+V+IV:»Q1duvva%>                INFL-EVEN           ;
!            +TV+Der1+Der/PassL+V+IV+PrfPrc:»Q1duvvu%>m               K                   ; ! prf prc is -am, not -um
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der2+Der/NomAg:»Q1duvva@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORder ;
    +TV+Der1+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der3+Der/lis+A:»Q1duvva»Y3liss           LIS                 ;
!   +TV+Der1+Der/Pass+Der2+Der/duhtte+V:»Q1duhtte%>               BASSATINCH          ; !theres no passive here, only duhttet
! +TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/InchL+V:»X7dalla»goahte%>         INFL-EVEN           ; ! seems like many ot-verbs dont have -dallat passive
!                   +TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V:»X7dalla%>                INFL-EVEN           ; ! same
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der2+Der/NomAg:»X7dalla@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORder ;
!    +TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/lis+A:»X7dalla»Y3liss           LIS                 ;
!    +TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/mus+N:»X7dalla»muss flagMUS                 ; 
!   +TV+Der1+Der/Pass+Der2+Der/dahtte+V:»X7dahtte%>               BASSATINCH          ; !theres no passive here, only dahttet
            +TV+Der1+Der/PassL+V+IV+PrfPrc+Sh:»Q1dum%>                  K                   ; 
                            @C.NeedNoun@ GÁDJOT_TV_flagged                             ;
LEXICON GÁDJOT_TV_flagged
    +TV+Der1+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der3+Der/mus+N:»Q1duvva»muss             MUS                 ;
            

!!€gt-norm: sjpædtjot # Even-syllable test
!!€ sjpættjov:           sjpædtjot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ sjpättjov:           sjpædtjot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ sjpædtjuv:           sjpædtjot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ sjpädtjuv:           sjpædtjot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ sjpættjojma:         sjpædtjot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
!!€ sjpättjojma:         sjpædtjot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1


LEXICON JÅRGGOT_TV !!= @CODE@ o-verbs with dim -astit that are hardcoded.  Duvvat and dallat passive.
                                   +TV:%>                        GÁDJOTStem          ;
                                   +TV:                          DeverbalVerbsJUHKAT ;
                              +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu                 V-ODD-PRET          ;
!+TV: EVEN-PASSIVE ; replaced by individual pointers to avoid short pass.
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V:»Y9u OADDÁTINCH ; NO SHORT PASS HERE! !replaced by individual pointers to avoid pass + actio, reintroduced since it is usual!
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/InchL+V:»Y9ugoahte%> INFL-EVEN ;
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V:»Y9u INFL-CONTRACTED ;
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der2+Der/NomAg:»Y9ujiddje@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORder ;
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der3+Der/mus+N:»Y9umuss flagMUS ;
 +TV+Der1+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V:»Q1duvva»goahte%>         INFL-EVEN           ;
                   +TV+Der1+Der/PassL+V+IV:»Q1duvva%>                INFL-EVEN           ;
!            +TV+Der1+Der/PassL+V+IV+PrfPrc:»Q1duvvu%>m               K                   ; ! prf prc is -am, not -um
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der2+Der/NomAg:»Q1duvva@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORder ;
    +TV+Der1+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der3+Der/lis+A:»Q1duvva»Y3liss           LIS                 ;
!   +TV+Der1+Der/Pass+Der2+Der/duhtte+V:»Q1duhtte%>               BASSATINCH          ; !theres no passive here, only duhttet
 +TV+Der1+Der/PassD+V+Der3+Der/InchL+V+IV:»X7dalla»goahte%>         INFL-EVEN           ; 
                   +TV+Der1+Der/PassD+V+IV:»X7dalla%>                INFL-EVEN           ; 
!+TV+Der1+Der/Pass+V+Der2+Der/NomAg:»X7dalla@C.NeedNoun@  ACTORder ;
    +TV+Der1+Der/PassD+V+Der3+Der/lis+A:»X7dalla»Y3liss           LIS                 ; 
    +TV+Der1+Der/PassD+V+Der3+Der/mus+N:»X7dalla»muss flagMUS                 ; 
 !  +TV+Der1+Der/Pass+Der2+Der/dahtte+V:»X7dahtte%>               BASSATINCH          ; !theres no passive here, only dahttet
            +TV+Der1+Der/PassL+V+IV+PrfPrc+Sh:»Q1dum%>                  K                   ;
                            @C.NeedNoun@ JÅRGGOT_TV_flagged                            ;
LEXICON JÅRGGOT_TV_flagged
     +TV+Der1+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der3+Der/mus+N:»Q1duvva»muss            MUS                 ; 
!!€gt-norm: boarkkot # Even-syllable test
!!€ boarkov:           boarkkot+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ boarkkuv:          boarkkot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ boarkojma:         boarkkot+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON PRSPRC !SUB ! This is for PrsPrc as Adj.
 : flagENDLEX ; !Can only be Attr. !


LEXICON PRSPRCODD !SUB ! This is for PrsPrc as Adj.
:%>iddje flagENDLEX ; !Can only be Attr. !

LEXICON PRSPRCCONTR !SUB ! This is for PrsPrc as Adj.
 :%>jiddje flagENDLEX ; !Can only be Attr. !

LEXICON flagENDLEX 
@C.NeedNoun@ ENDLEX ;

LEXICON BASSATStem
   BASSATINCH ;

LEXICON RAVGGATStem
   RAVGGATINCH ;

LEXICON ASSTATStem
   ASSTATINCH ;


LEXICON VIEDJETStem
   VIEDJETINCH ;

LEXICON JIEHKETStem
   JIEHKETINCH ;
