src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
boarkkot+V:boarkko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
buodnjot+V:buodnjo GÁDJOT_TV ;
buorggot+V:buorggo GÁDJOT_TV ;
bálkkot+V:bálkko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
bálltot+V:bállto JÅRGGOT_TV ;
båhkkot+V:båhkko GÁDJOT_TV ;
bålltot+V:bållto JÅRGGOT_TV ;
båssot+V:båsso JÅRGGOT_TV ;
diehtet+V:dieht DIEHTET_TV ;
dievnnut+V+Err/Orth:dievnno GÁDJOT_TV ;
divvot+V:divvo GÁDJOT_TV ;
diŋŋgut+V+Err/Orth:diŋŋgo GÁDJOT_TV ;
doahpot+V:doahpo JÅRGGOT_TV ; ! ? doabastit+V:doabast UNNEDIT_TV 
doallot+V:doallo GÁDJOT_TV ;
doarjjot+V:doarjjo GÁDJOT_TV ;
duhtot+V:duhto GÁDJOT_TV ;
duolggot+V:duolggo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
duolmmot+V:duolmmo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
duorrot+V:duorro GÁDJOT_TV ;
duosstot+V:duossto JÅRGGOT_TV ;
dálkkot+V:dálkko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
dæbttjot+v1+V:dæbttjo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
dæbttjot+v2+V:dæpptjo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
fierrot+V:fierro JÅRGGOT_TV ;
fármmot+V:fármmo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
gahtsot+V:gahtso GÁDJOT_TV ;
garttsot+V:garttso JÅRGGOT_TV ;
giehttot+V:giehtto GÁDJOT_TV ;
girnnot+V:girnno GÁDJOT_TV ;
goajvvot+V:goajvvo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
goavllot+V:goavllo GÁDJOT_TV ;
guolljot+V:guolljo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
guossot+V:guosso GÁDJOT_TV ;
gárddot+V:gárddo GÁDJOT_TV ;
gávllot+V:gávllo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
gåvllot+V:gåvllo GÁDJOT_TV ;
gærddot+V:gærddo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
hoarkkot+V:hoarkko GÁDJOT_TV ;
hálssot+V:hálsso GÁDJOT_TV ;
hámssot+V:hámsso JÅRGGOT_TV ;
jielppot+V:jielppo GÁDJOT_TV ;
juovttsot+V:juovttso JÅRGGOT_TV ;
jårggot+V:jårggo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
jæsskot+V:jæssko GÁDJOT_TV ;
lavnnjot+V:lavnnjo GÁDJOT_TV ;
liehkkot+V:liehkko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
loadtjot+V:loadtjo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
luobbot+V:luobbo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
luoddot+V:luoddo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
luosskot+V:luossko GÁDJOT_TV ;
lánntjot+V:lánntjo GÁDJOT_TV ;
lávllot+V:lávllo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
lávllot+V+Err/Orth:lavllo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
lådjot+V:lådjo GÁDJOT_TV ;
låggot+V:låggo GÁDJOT_TV ;
læjkkot+V:læjkko GÁDJOT_TV ;
muggot+V:muggo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
máhttsot+V:máhttso JÅRGGOT_TV ;
májnnot+V:májnno JÅRGGOT_TV ;
mådtsot+V:mådtso JÅRGGOT_TV ;
målssot+V:målsso JÅRGGOT_TV ;
mærkkot+V:mærkko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
nibrrot+V:nibrro GÁDJOT_TV ;
nirvvot+V:nirvvo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
njadtsot+V:njadtso JÅRGGOT_TV ;
njallot+V:njallo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
njasskot+V:njassko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
njissjkot+V:njissjko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
njoallot+V:njoallo GÁDJOT_TV ;
njálggot+V:njálggo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
noajddot+V:noajddo GÁDJOT_TV ;
noalltot+V:noallto JÅRGGOT_TV ;
nádot+V:nádo GÁDJOT_TV ;
oadtjot+V:oadtjo GÁDJOT_TV ;
oallot+V:oallo GÁDJOT_TV ;
oarttjot+V:oarttjo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
ravggot+V:ravggo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
rievvot+V:rievvo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
rihppot+V:rihppo GÁDJOT_TV ;
ruohkkot+V:ruohkko GÁDJOT_TV ;
rábjjot+V:rábjjo GÁDJOT_TV ;
ráhpot+V:ráhpo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
rámssot+V:rámsso JÅRGGOT_TV ;
råhtot+V:råhto GÁDJOT_TV ;
sallot+V:sallo GÁDJOT_TV ;
sihkkot+V:sihkko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
sjpædtjot+V:sjpædtjo GÁDJOT_TV ;
sjvássjkot+V:sjvássjko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
sjærggot+V:sjærggo GÁDJOT_TV ;
skuorrot+V:skuorro GÁDJOT_TV ;
skárttot+V:skártto GÁDJOT_TV ;
slærggot+V:slærggo GÁDJOT_TV ;
smållot+V:smållo GÁDJOT_TV ;
snjissjkot+v1+V:snjissjko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
snjissjkot+v2+V:sjnjissjko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
snjisskot+v1+V:snjissko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
snjisskot+v2+V:sjnjissko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
snussot+V:snusso GÁDJOT_TV ;
snælkkot+V:snælkko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
soajrrot+V:soajrro GÁDJOT_TV ;
soallot+V:soallo GÁDJOT_TV ;
spielkkot+V:spielkko GÁDJOT_TV ;
spædtjot+V:spædtjo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
spæhkkot+V:spæhkko GÁDJOT_TV ;
stoallot+V:stoallo GÁDJOT_TV ;
suohppot+V:suohppo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
svassjkot+V:svassjko GÁDJOT_TV ;
sárggot+V:sárggo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
sárnnot+V:sárnno GÁDJOT_TV ;
sårjjot+V:sårjjo GÁDJOT_TV ;
sædot+V:sædo GÁDJOT_TV ;
tjoallot+V:tjoallo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
tjuoggot+V:tjuoggo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
tjuovvot+V:tjuovvo GÁDJOT_TV ;
tjåhkot+V:tjåhko GÁDJOT_TV ;
tjållot+V:tjållo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
tsipptsot+V:tsipptso JÅRGGOT_TV ;
tsoabbmot+V:tsoabbmo GÁDJOT_TV ;
tsuojggot+V:tsuojggo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
tsuorvvot+V:tsuorvvo GÁDJOT_TV ;
tsæggot+V:tsæggo JÅRGGOT_TV ;
vasskot+V:vassko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
vidtjot+V:vidtjo GÁDJOT_TV ;
vuohttot+V:vuohtto GÁDJOT_TV ;
vuorbbot+V:vuorbbo GÁDJOT_TV ;
vuorkkot+V:vuorkko JÅRGGOT_TV ;
váksjot+V:váksjo GÁDJOT_TV ;
ádnot+V:ádno GÁDJOT_TV ;
ávŋŋot+V:ávŋŋo GÁDJOT_TV ;
